Utah statutes.
59-2-217.   Property escaping assessment -- Duties of assessing authority --
Property willfully concealed -- Penalties.
(1)  Any escaped property may be assessed by the original assessing authority
at any time as far back as five years prior to the time of discovery, in which
case the assessing authority shall enter the assessments on the tax rolls and
follow the procedures established under Part 13 of this chapter.
(2)  Any property found to be willfully concealed, removed, transferred, or
misrepresented by its owner or agent in order to evade taxation is subject to
a penalty equal to the tax on its value, and neither the penalty nor
assessment may be reduced by the county board of equalization or the
commission.
